test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_IIHL_STEM_3.yaml
# YAML file for Class CLASS_IIHL_STEM_3 verbs

Config:
 hfst:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
 xerox:
  Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
  Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

    # CLASS_IIHL_STEM_3

     níihl+V+INTERROGATIVE+PAST: néelaa
     níihl+V+INDIRECT+PAST: néelaan
     níihl+V+RELATIVE+EVIDENTIAL: néelaas
     níihl+V+PAST+NON_FACTIVE: néelaa.ang
     níihl+V+CERTAIN+PRESENT: néel'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+CERTAIN+PAST: néel'ahlanggan
     níihl+V+CERTAIN+PAST+HABITUAL: néel'ahlanggiinii
     níihl+V+CERTAIN+RELATIVE: néel'ahlans
     níihl+V+INTENSIVE+PAST: néelaa'ahlang
     níihl+V+SHOULD_KEEP_ON_VERBING_FOR_A_WHILE: néelaa'ahlanggaa
     níihl+V+COUNTERFACTUAL+PRESENT: néelaa'ahlanggang
     níihl+V+REFLEXIVE: néel'ahl
